Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7 Foundation Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-7-29.
Minimum salary schedule.

Every municipality and regional school district shall establish and put into full effect by appropriate action of its school committee in a municipality or regional school district where the school committee is elected, or by appropriate action of the chief executive officer, in a municipality where the school committee is appointed, a salary schedule recognizing years of service, experience, and training for all certified personnel regularly employed in the public schools and having no more than twelve (12) annual steps. The term “school year” as applied to the salary schedule means the ten (10) calendar months beginning in September and ending the following June.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a freeze or reduction of the monetary value of the steps in the salary schedule through the collective bargaining process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 10; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1992, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 4.

Part-Time Teacher.

A teacher who was hired as a part-time language tutor and provided in-school tutoring over a four-year period, with her hours determined by the number of students assigned to her, was “regularly employed,” and therefore entitled to credit for purposes of placement on the salary schedule. D'Ambra v. North Providence Sch. Comm., 601 A.2d 1370,

1992 R.I. LEXIS 4

(R.I. 1992).

16-7-30.
School attendance when high school not maintained by community.

A community not maintaining a high school shall make provision for the free attendance of its children at some high school or academy approved by the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-7-31.
Failure of community to furnish funds — Withholding of state funds.

If any community shall fail to maintain local appropriation or fail to appropriate or otherwise make available to the school committee the minimum sums provided in this chapter, including specifically but without limitation the minimum salary schedule as established in §

16-7-29

, and the funds and funding levels required for voluntary participation as an EPSDT provider pursuant to §

40-8-18

, all state education as provided in Title 16, and the minimum budget provision as established in §

16-7-23

, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may notify the general treasurer of the amount of any deficiency. The general treasurer, on being so informed in writing of the amount of the deficiency by the commissioner, shall withhold state funds otherwise due during the subsequent state fiscal year to the community for its general uses and purposes in an amount equal to the deficiency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 11; P.L. 1983, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 289, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 1.

16-7-32.
Annual review of expenditures.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall annually review actual expenditures in each school year and in case any community fails to adequately support the programs shared by the state, as provided in §§

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

, the commissioner shall inquire into the cause or causes of this failure of the community to adequately support the programs shared by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 11.

16-7-33.
Evaluation of operations — Recommendations.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education is directed to evaluate the operation of this chapter, and at least once every three (3) years the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall review the findings of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and shall make its recommendations in writing to the governor and to the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 11.

16-7-34.
Appropriation of funds.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of §§

16-5-31

and

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of this sum, or so much of that sum as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 13.

16-7-34.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 4; P.L. 1968, ch. 170, § 4; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 44; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

16-7-34.2.
Appropriation of funds for education of children with disabilities.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education the sums that it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section for distribution to local and regional school districts on the basis of the ratio which the children with disabilities in that district bear to the state total of children with disabilities; provided however, that no school district receives less than twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) for the purpose of financially assisting school programs for the child with a disability currently in operation and those programs initiated by the district in the future, and as approved by the department of elementary and secondary education; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of that sum as may be from time to time required, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers approved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The department shall have the power to require that the programs shall be administered and supervised by the local districts in a manner that the department deems most feasible educationally and most sound economically.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 160, § 5; P.L. 1968, ch. 170, § 5; P.L. 1976, ch. 130, § 9; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 44; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 24; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 24.

16-7-34.3.
Reimbursement by the state for conventional public housing students.

Each school district shall be reimbursed for expenditures for services and instructional programs for students residing in conventional public housing units owned by public housing authorities which are not on local tax rolls. Reimbursement shall be made when the services and programs have been carried out in accordance with the requirements of state law and regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. The following formula shall be used to distribute aid for the students residing in the public housing units:

The following formula and definitions are to be used to determine the entitlement for each school district:

The incentive entitlement for a district shall be the product of the average per pupil cost for the district, the number of full time equivalent pupils in grade 12 and below residing in conventional public housing, and the state share ratio for the district.

In this formula the following terms have the following meanings:

“Incentive entitlement” means the sum payable to a local school district under this formula.

“Average per pupil costs for the district” means all expenditures approved by the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education as defined in §

16-7-20

plus the costs of special education required under chapter 24 of this title divided by average daily membership of pupils as determined in §

16-7-22(1)

.

“State share ratio” means the effective state share ratio as calculated under §

16-7-20

.

“Conventional public housing” means those properties identified as eligible low rent housing projects under title I of P.L. 81-874, 20 U.S.C. § 236 et seq.

Students living on property owned by the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation shall also be included in computations under this section.

Students living in the North Kingstown Traveler’s Aid housing project shall also be included in computations under this section.

An amount shall be appropriated for the purpose of reimbursing school districts as required pursuant to subsection (a) for conventional public housing.

If the sum appropriated in subsection (a) of this section is not sufficient to pay in full the amount for conventional public housing which each city and town is entitled to receive in any fiscal year, the maximum amount which all cities and towns are entitled to receive under this section shall be deducted from the sum appropriated for all cities and towns under §

16-7-20

. If, after final allocation of §§

16-7-15

through

16-7-34

, a district receives more than one hundred percent (100%) reimbursement, the excess shall be deducted from this conventional public housing allocation in the following fiscal year.

Reimbursement payments as calculated under this chapter shall be made according to §

16-7-16

. All payments under this chapter shall be used exclusively to support services for conventional public housing students.

Expenditure reports shall be submitted by the local school districts to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in accordance with rules and regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 31.

16-7-35.
Foundation program for school housing — Declaration of policy.

Sections

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

are designed to:

Guarantee adequate school housing for all public school children in the state, and

Prevent the cost of school housing from interfering with the effective operation of the schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 1.

16-7-36.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

have the following meanings:

“Adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation” means the equalized weighted assessed valuation for a community as determined by the division of property valuation within the department of revenue in accordance with §

16-7-21

; provided, however, that in the case of a regional school district the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall apportion the adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation of the member cities or towns among the regional school district and the member cities or towns according to the proportion that the number of pupils of the regional school district bears to the number of pupils of the member cities or towns.

“Approved project” means a project which has complied with the administrative regulations governing §§

16-7-35

through

16-7-47

, and which has been authorized to receive state school housing reimbursement by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

“Commissioning agent” means a person or entity who ensures that systems are designed, installed, functionally tested, and capable of being operated and maintained to perform in conformity with the design intent of a project.

“Community” means any city, town, or regional school district established pursuant to law; provided, however, that the member towns of the Chariho regional high school district, created by P.L. 1958, ch. 55, as amended, shall constitute separate and individual communities for the purposes of distributing the foundation level school support for school housing for all grades financed in whole or in part by the towns irrespective of any regionalization.

“Facilities condition index” means the cost to fully repair the building divided by the cost to replace the building as determined by the school building authority.

“Functional utilization” means the ratio of the student population within a school facility to the capacity of the school facility to adequately serve students as defined by the school building authority.

“Maintenance expenditures” means amounts spent for repairs or replacements for the purpose of keeping a school facility open and safe for use, including repairs, maintenance, and replacements to a school facility’s heating, lighting, ventilation, security, and other fixtures to keep the facility or fixtures in effective working condition. Maintenance shall not include contracted or direct custodial or janitorial services, expenditures for the cleaning of a school facility or its fixtures, the care and upkeep of grounds, recreational facilities, or parking lots, or the cleaning of or repairs and replacements to movable furnishings or equipment.

“Owner’s program manager” means owner’s program manager as defined in §

37-2-7

.

“Prime contractor” means the construction contractor who is responsible for the completion of a project.

“Reference year” means the year next prior to the school year immediately preceding that in which aid is to be paid.

“Subject to inflation” means the base amount multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Producer Price Index (PPI) Data for Nonresidential Building Construction (NAICS 236222) as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 9; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-37.
Reports from communities.

The superintendent of schools in each community shall certify to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education by the dates designated in accordance with the regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education any information that may be needed for the operation of §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

, in any form and upon any blanks that the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1.

16-7-38.
Time for payments to communities.

There shall be paid on September 15 and March 15 of each year one-half (1/2) of the amount to which each community is entitled in terms of the computation in §

16-7-41

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 5.

16-7-39.
Computation of school housing-aid ratio.

For each community, the percent of state aid for school housing costs shall be computed in the following manner:

The adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation for the district is divided by the resident average daily membership for the district (grades twelve (12) and below); (2) The adjusted equalized weighted assessed valuation for the state is divided by the resident average daily membership for the state (grades twelve (12) and below); (1) is then divided by (2) and the resultant ratio is multiplied by a factor currently set at sixty-two percent (62%) which represents the approximate average district share of school support; the resulting product is then subtracted from one hundred percent (100%) to yield the housing aid share ratio, provided that in no case shall the ratio be less than thirty percent (30%). Provided, that effective July 1, 2010, and annually at the start of each fiscal year thereafter, the thirty percent (30%) floor on said housing-aid share shall be increased by five percent (5%) increments each year until said floor on the housing-aid share ratio reaches a minimum of not less than forty percent (40%). This provision shall apply only to school housing projects completed after June 30, 2010, that received approval from the board of regents prior to June 30, 2012. Provided further, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2012, and for subsequent fiscal years, the minimum housing aid share shall be thirty-five percent (35%) for all projects receiving council on elementary and secondary education approval after June 30, 2012. The resident average daily membership shall be determined in accordance with §

16-7-22(1)

.

No district shall receive a combined total of more than twenty (20) incentive percentage points for projects that commence construction by December 30, 2023, and five (5) incentive points for projects that commence construction thereafter; provided further, these caps shall be in addition to amounts received under §§

16-7-40(a)(1)

and

16-7-40(a)(2)

. Furthermore, a district’s share shall not be decreased by more than half of its regular share irrespective of the number of incentive points received nor shall a district’s state share increase by more than half of its regular share, including amounts received under §§

16-7-40(a)(1)

and

16-7-40(a)(2)

, irrespective of the number of incentive points received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 5; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 44; P.L. 1989, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 24, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-40.
Increased school housing ratio.

In the case of regional school districts, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by two percent (2%) for each grade so consolidated.

Regional school districts undertaking renovation project(s) shall receive an increased share ratio of four percent (4%) for those specific project(s) only, in addition to the combined share ratio calculated in §

16-7-39

and this subsection.

In the case of projects undertaken by districts specifically for the purposes of school safety and security, the school housing aid share ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) for these specific projects only, in the calculation of school housing aid. The increased share ratio shall continue to be applied for as long as the project(s) receives state housing aid. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, seventy-five percent (75%) of the project costs must be specifically directed to school safety and security measures. The council on elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and operation of this section.

For purposes of addressing health and safety deficiencies as defined by the school building authority, including the remediation of hazardous materials, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as the construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.

For purposes of educational enhancement, including projects devoted to the enhancement of early childhood education and career and technical education, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to these purposes.

For replacement of a facility that has a facilities condition index of sixty-five percent (65%) or higher, the school housing ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, does not receive a bonus pursuant to subsection (f) or subsection (g), and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.

For any new construction or renovation that increases the functional utilization of any facility from less than sixty percent (60%) to more than eighty percent (80%), including the consolidation of school buildings within or across districts, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.

For any new construction or renovation that decreases the functional utilization of any facility from more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) to between eighty-five percent (85%) to one hundred five percent (105%), the school housing ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, and a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot. In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.

For consolidation of two (2) or more school buildings, within or across districts into one school building, the school housing aid ratio shall be increased by five percent (5%) so long as construction of the project commences by December 30, 2023, is completed by December 30, 2028, a two hundred fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot, and does not receive a bonus pursuant to subsection (f) or subsection (g). In order to qualify for the increased share ratio, twenty-five percent (25%) of the project costs or a minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) must be specifically directed to this purpose.

Any regionalized and/or non-regionalized school district receiving an increased share ratio for a project approved prior to July 1, 2018, shall continue to receive the increased share ratio for as long as the project receives state housing aid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 6; P.L. 1962, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 44; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 24; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 24; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

16-7-41.
Computation of school housing aid.

In each fiscal year the state shall pay to each community a grant to be applied to the cost of school housing equal to the following:

The cost of each new school housing project certified to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education not later than July 15 of the fiscal year shall be divided by the actual number of years of the bond issued by the local community or the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation in support of the specific project, times the school housing aid ratio; and provided, further, with respect to costs of new school projects financed with proceeds of bonds issued by the local community or the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation in support of the specific project, the amount of the school housing aid payable in each fiscal year shall not exceed the amount arrived at by multiplying the principal and interest of the bonds payable in each fiscal year by the school housing aid ratio and which principal and interest amount over the life of the bonds, shall, in no event, exceed the costs of each new school housing project certified to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. If a community fails to specify or identify the appropriate reimbursement schedule, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may at his or her discretion set up to a five (5) year reimbursement cycle for projects under five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); up to ten (10) years for projects up to three million dollars ($3,000,000); and up to twenty (20) years for projects over three million dollars ($3,000,000).

Aid shall be provided for the same period as the life of the bonds issued in support of the project and at the school housing aid ratio applicable to the local community as set forth in §

16-7-39

at the time the project is approved by the council on elementary and secondary education.

Aid shall be paid either to the community or in the case of projects financed through the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, to the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation or its designee including, but not limited to, a trustee under a bond indenture or loan and trust agreement, in support of bonds issued for specific projects of the local community in accordance with this section, §

16-7-40

and §

16-7-44

. Notwithstanding the preceding, in case of failure of any city, town, or district to pay the amount due in support of bonds issued on behalf of a city, town, school or district project financed by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, upon notification by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, the general treasurer shall deduct the amount from aid provided under this section, §

16-7-40

, §

16-7-44

and §

16-7-15

through §

16-7-34.3

due the city, town, or district and direct said funding to the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation or its designee.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, in connection with the issuance of refunding bonds benefiting any local community, any net interest savings resulting from the refunding bonds issued by such community or a municipal public buildings authority for the benefit of the community or by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation for the benefit of the community, in each case in support of school housing projects for the community, shall be allocated between the community and the state of Rhode Island, by applying the applicable school housing aid ratio at the time of issuance of the refunding bonds, calculated pursuant to §

16-7-39

, that would otherwise apply in connection with school housing projects of the community; provided however, that for any refundings that occur between July 1, 2013, and December 31, 2015, the community shall receive eighty percent (80%) of the total savings and the state shall receive twenty percent (20%). In connection with any such refunding of bonds, the finance director or the chief financial officer of the community shall certify such net interest savings to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. Notwithstanding §

16-7-44

or any other provision of law to the contrary, school housing projects costs in connection with any such refunding bond issue shall include bond issuance costs incurred by the community, the municipal public buildings authority, or the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, as the case may be, in connection therewith. In connection with any refunding bond issue, school housing project costs shall include the cost of interest payments on such refunding bonds, if the cost of interest payments was included as a school housing cost for the bonds being refunded. A local community or municipal public buildings authority shall not be entitled to the benefits of this subsection (d) unless the net present value savings resulting from the refunding is at least three percent (3%) of the refunded bond issue.

Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall cause to be monitored the potential for refunding outstanding bonds of local communities or municipal public building authorities or of the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation issued for the benefit of local communities or municipal public building authorities and benefiting from any aid referenced in this section. In the event it is determined by said monitoring that the net present value savings which could be achieved by refunding such bonds of the type referenced in the prior sentence including any direct costs normally associated with such refundings is equal to (i) at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and (ii) for the state and the communities or public building authorities at least three percent (3%) of the bond issue to be refunded including associated costs then, in such event, the commissioner (or his or her designee) may direct the local community or municipal public building authority for the benefit of which the bonds were issued, to refund such bonds. Failure of the local community or municipal public buildings authority to timely refund such bonds, except due to causes beyond the reasonable control of such local community or municipal public building authority, shall result in the reduction by the state of the aid referenced in this §

16-7-41

associated with the bonds directed to be refunded in an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the net present value savings reasonably estimated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education (or his or her designee) which would have been achieved had the bonds directed to be refunded been refunded by the ninetieth (90th) day (or if such day is not a business day in the state of Rhode Island, the next succeeding business day) following the date of issuance of the directive of the commissioner (or his or her designee) to refund such bonds. Such reduction in the aid shall begin in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the commissioner issued such directive for the remaining term of the bond.

Payments shall be made in accordance with §

16-7-40

and this section.

For purposes of financing or refinancing school facilities in the city of Central Falls through the issuance of bonds through the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, the city of Central Falls shall be considered an “educational institution” within the meaning of §

45-38.1-3(13)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 7; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 471, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-41.1.
Eligibility for reimbursement.

School districts, not municipalities, may apply for and obtain approval for a project under the necessity of school construction process set forth in the regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education, provided, however, in the case of a municipality that issues bonds through the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation to finance or refinance school facilities for a school district that is not part of the municipality, the municipality may apply for and obtain approval for a project. Such approval will remain valid until June 30 of the third fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the council on elementary and secondary education’s approval is granted. Only those projects undertaken at school facilities under the care and control of the school committee and located on school property may qualify for reimbursement under §§

16-7-35

—

16-7-47

. Facilities with combined school and municipal uses or facilities that are operated jointly with any other profit or nonprofit agency do not qualify for reimbursement under §§

16-7-35

—

16-7-47

. Projects completed by June 30 of a fiscal year are eligible for reimbursement in the following fiscal year. A project for new school housing or additional housing shall be deemed to be completed when the work has been officially accepted by the school committee or when the housing is occupied for its intended use by the school committee, whichever is earlier.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of regents shall not grant final approval for any project between June 30, 2011, and May 1, 2015, except for projects that are necessitated by immediate health and safety reasons. In the event that a project is requested during the moratorium because of immediate health and safety reasons, those proposals shall be reported to the chairs of the house and senate finance committees.

Any project approval granted prior to the adoption of the school construction regulations in 2007, and which are currently inactive; and any project approval granted prior to the adoption of the school construction regulations in 2007 which did not receive voter approval or which has not been previously financed, are no longer eligible for reimbursement under this chapter. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop recommendations for further cost containment strategies in the school housing aid program.

Beginning July 1, 2015, the council on elementary and secondary education shall approve new necessity of school construction applications on an annual basis. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop an annual application timeline for local education agencies seeking new necessity of school construction approvals.

Beginning July 1, 2019, no state funding shall be provided for projects in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) unless the prime contractor for the project has received prequalification from the school building authority.

Beginning July 1, 2019, the necessity of school construction process set forth in the regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education shall include a single statewide process, developed with the consultation of the department of environmental management, that will ensure community involvement throughout the investigation and remediation of contaminated building sites for possible reuse as the location of a school. That process will fulfill all provisions of §

23-19.14-5

related to the investigation of reuse of such sites for schools.

Beginning July 1, 2019, school housing projects exceeding one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) subject to inflation shall include an owner’s program manager and a commissioning agent. The cost of the program manager and commissioning agent shall be considered a project cost eligible for aid pursuant to §§

16-7-41

and

16-105-5

.

Temporary housing, or swing space, for students shall be a reimbursable expense so long as a district can demonstrate that no other viable option to temporarily house students exists and provided that use of the temporary space is time limited for a period not to exceed twenty-four (24) months and tied to a specific construction project.

Environmental site remediation, as defined by the school building authority, shall be a reimbursable expense up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) per project.

If, within thirty (30) years of construction, a newly constructed school is sold to a private entity, the state shall receive a portion of the sale proceeds equal to that project’s housing aid reimbursement rate at the time of project completion.

All projects must comply with §

37-13-6

, ensuring that prevailing wage laws are being followed, and §

37-14.1-6

, ensuring that minority business enterprises reach a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the dollar value of the bid.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 5, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 21; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-42.
Other aid for school housing projects — Effect.

In the computations of §§

16-7-35

—

16-7-47

, only that portion of the cost of school housing projects for which no aid has been received from the federal government under the provision of any present or subsequent federal legislation shall be used. In the computations of §§

16-7-35

—

16-7-47

, the cost of a school housing project shall be reduced by the amount of federal aid and other private and public funding that is applied to the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 8; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 3.

16-7-43.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 9; Repealed by P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 4, effective July 1, 2003.